Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5541
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Revenue, in consultation with the Governor and the Department of Economic Development, may, but is not required to, adopt and promulgate all rules and regulations determined by the Tax Commissioner in his or her discretion to be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the Invest Nebraska Act.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 41.